Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-312
Defendants; how designated; misnomer; when immaterial.

(1) In all actions upon bills of exchange or promissory notes, or other written instruments, and in all actions described in subsection (2) of this section, it is sufficient to designate any defendant by the name or part of name by which he or she is designated in the instrument upon which action is brought, or by which he or she appears of record to have some interest, right, title, estate in or lien upon the property involved in such action or proceeding, and for all the purposes of such action or proceeding such name shall be considered the real name of such defendant.

(2) This section applies to (a) actions brought under section 25-401, 25-402, or 25-403 and (b) actions which relate to, or the subject of which is, real or personal property in this state, if the defendant has or claims a lien or interest, actual or contingent, in such property, or the relief demanded consists wholly or partially in excluding the defendant from any interest in such property, and such defendant is a nonresident of the state or is a foreign corporation.

R.S.1867, Code § 23, p. 397;

R.S.1913, § 7593;

Laws 1921, c. 220, § 34, p. 795;

C.S.1922, § 8536;

C.S.1929, § 20-312;

R.S.1943, § 25-312;

Laws 1997, LB 1, § 1.

Action upon promissory note may be brought against maker in name by which he signed note hereunder. Bresee v. Snyder, 94 Neb. 384, 143 N.W. 219 (1913).

A cause of action collateral to the instrument, and not based thereon, is not within the purview of this section. Gillian v. McDowall, 66 Neb. 814, 92 N.W. 991 (1902).

Where note and chattel mortgage are assigned to purchaser by his initials, he comes within exception and may sue and foreclose by action without giving full name. Richardson v. Opelt, 60 Neb. 180, 82 N.W. 377 (1900).

Prescribed mode of procedure must be closely followed. Church v. Callihan, 49 Neb. 542, 68 N.W. 932 (1896).

Misnomer in action may be taken advantage of any time before judgment. Small v. Sandall, 48 Neb. 318, 67 N.W. 156 (1896).

Where plaintiff is designated in the pleadings and process by initials, court may allow amendment to insert full name. Real v. Honey, 39 Neb. 516, 58 N.W. 136 (1894).